Utah statutes.
58-80a-401.   Grounds for denial of certification -- Disciplinary
proceedings.
Grounds for refusing to issue a certification to an applicant, for refusing to
renew the certification of a certified medical language interpreter, for
revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing on probation the certification
of a certified medical language interpreter, for issuing a public or private
reprimand to a certified medical language interpreter, and for issuing a cease
and desist order shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401.
